dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="wersj/a__n_f# beta">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i/wersyj</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f# beta"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="astronomi/a__n_ma">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chłop__n_mp">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ren__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bokser__n_ma">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>zy</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>zy</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/ąb__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ąb</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ąb</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęba</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębowi</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębie</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębem</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębie</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęby</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęby</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębów</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębom</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębach</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ębami</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ęby</l><r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="astronomia"><i>astronomi</i><par n="astronomi/a__n_ma"/></e>
    <e lm="bokser"><i>bokser</i><par n="bokser__n_ma"/></e>
    <e lm="chłop"><i>chłop</i><par n="chłop__n_mp"/></e>
    <e lm="pingwin"><i>pingwin</i><par n="ren__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="ren"><i>ren</i><par n="ren__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="wersja"><i>wersj</i><par n="wersj/a__n_f# beta"/></e>
    <e lm="ząb"><i>z</i><par n="z/ąb__n_mi"/></e>
